Utah statutes.
31A-15-108.   Attorney fees.
In an action against an unauthorized person upon a contract of insurance
issued in violation of this chapter, if the unauthorized person fails to make
payment in accordance with the contract for 30 days after the payment is due
and demand is made, and it appears to the court that the failure was without
just cause, the court may allow the plaintiff a reasonable attorney's fee and
may include the fee in any judgment that may be rendered in the action.  The
unauthorized person's failure to defend this action is prima facie evidence
that the failure to pay was without just cause.
